New Jersey, session 222, A1323.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.  a.  A board of education of a school district 1and a board of trustees of a charter school or renaissance school project1 that utilizes a 1[video]1 surveillance system 1, including a video surveillance system, x-ray machine, or body scanner,1 with artificial intelligence capabilities shall be required to adopt a policy regarding the use of the surveillance system.  The policy, at a minimum, shall: (1) include information on the surveillance system installed in the district 1[, including the benefits and challenges of utilizing the system] or school1; (2) identify the type of information that is to be collected through the surveillance system; (3) include information on how the board plans to utilize the information obtained through the surveillance system; (4) address the boards plan to provide access to the information obtained through the surveillance system 1, in compliance with State and federal law governing student records and the provisions of the Uniform State Memorandum of Agreement Between Education and Law Enforcement Officials1; and (5) require the board to post signage in a prominent, public place in buildings and on school grounds where the surveillance system may be used.  The signage shall indicate that a surveillance system with artificial intelligence capabilities is in use in the building or on the school grounds. b.  The policy adopted by the board 1of education of a school district or the board of trustees of a charter school or renaissance school project that utilizes a video surveillance system1 shall comply with the provisions of section 1 of P.L.2017, c.119 (C.18A:41-9). c.  A board of education 1or board of trustees1 required to establish a policy pursuant to subsection a. of this section shall be required to distribute the policy to the parents and guardians of students within the district 1or school1. 1d. As used in this section, artificial intelligence means the development of software and hardware and the end-use application of technologies that are able to perform tasks normally requiring human intelligence, including, but not limited to, visual perception, speech recognition, decision-making, translation between languages, and generative artificial intelligence, which generates new content in response to user inputs of data.1 2.    This act shall take effect immediately and shall first apply to the first full school year following the date of enactment.